Illinois, session 104th, HB1713.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 534-3 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/34-3)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-3)7    Sec. 34-3. Chicago School Reform Board of Trustees; new 8Chicago Board of Education; members; term; vacancies. 9    (a) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of 1995, the terms of all members of the Chicago 11Board of Education holding office on that date are abolished 12and the Mayor shall appoint, without the consent or approval 13of the City Council, a 5 member Chicago School Reform Board of 14Trustees which shall take office upon the appointment of the 15fifth member. The Chicago School Reform Board of Trustees and 16its members shall serve until, and the terms of all members of 17the Chicago School Reform Board of Trustees shall expire on, 18June 30, 1999 or upon the appointment of a new Chicago Board of 19Education as provided in subsection (b), whichever is later. 20Any vacancy in the membership of the Trustees shall be filled 21through appointment by the Mayor, without the consent or 22approval of the City Council, for the unexpired term. One of 23the members appointed by the Mayor to the Trustees shall be   HB1713- 2 -LRB104 08168 LNS 18216 b1designated by the Mayor to serve as President of the Trustees. 2The Mayor shall appoint a full-time, compensated chief 3executive officer, and his or her compensation as such chief 4executive officer shall be determined by the Mayor. The Mayor, 5at his or her discretion, may appoint the President to serve 6simultaneously as the chief executive officer. 7    (b) This subsection applies until January 15, 2025. Within 830 days before the expiration of the terms of the members of 9the Chicago Reform Board of Trustees as provided in subsection 10(a), a new Chicago Board of Education consisting of 7 members 11shall be appointed by the Mayor to take office on the later of 12July 1, 1999 or the appointment of the seventh member. Three of 13the members initially so appointed under this subsection shall 14serve for terms ending June 30, 2002, 4 of the members 15initially so appointed under this subsection shall serve for 16terms ending June 30, 2003, and each member initially so 17appointed shall continue to hold office until his or her 18successor is appointed and qualified. Each member appointed by 19the Mayor on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 20of the 104th General Assembly under this subsection shall be 21appointed with the advice and consent of the City Council. 22    (b-5) On January 15, 2025, the terms of all members of the 23Chicago Board of Education appointed under subsection (b) are 24abolished when the new board, consisting of 21 members, is 25appointed, with the advice and consent of the City Council, by 26the Mayor and elected by the electors of the school district as   HB1713- 3 -LRB104 08168 LNS 18216 b1provided under subsections (b-10) and (b-15) and takes office. 2    (b-10) By December 16, 2024, the Mayor shall appoint, with 3the advice and consent of the City Council, a President of the 4Board for a 2-year term that begins January 15, 2025. The Board 5shall elect annually from its number a vice-president, in such 6manner and at such time as the Board determines by its rules. 7The President appointed by the Mayor and Vice-President 8elected by the Board shall each perform the duties imposed 9upon their respective office by the rules of the Board, 10provided that (i) the President shall preside at meetings of 11the board and shall only have voting rights to break a voting 12tie of the other Chicago Board of Education elected and 13appointed members and (ii) the Vice-President shall perform 14the duties of the President if that office is vacant or the 15President is absent or unable to act. Beginning with the 2026 16general election, one member shall be elected at large and 17serve as the President of the Board for a 4-year term that 18begins January 15, 2027. On and after January 15, 2027, the 19President of the Board shall preside at meetings of the Board 20and vote as any other member but have no power of veto. The 21Secretary of the Board shall be selected by the Board and shall 22be an employee of the Board rather than a member of the Board, 23notwithstanding subsection (d) of Section 34-3.3. The duties 24of the Secretary shall be imposed by the rules of the Board.25    (b-15) For purposes of selection of members of the Chicago 26Board of Education, the City of Chicago shall be divided into   HB1713- 4 -LRB104 08168 LNS 18216 b110 districts, and each of those 10 districts shall be 2subdivided into 2 subdistricts as provided in subsection (a) 3of Section 34-21.10. 4    Until January 15, 2027, each district shall be represented 5by one member who is elected at the 2024 general election to a 62-year term that begins January 15, 2025 and one member who is 7appointed by the Mayor, with the advice and consent of the City 8Council, by no later than December 16, 2024 to a 2-year term 9that begins January 15, 2025. Each elected member shall reside 10within the district that the member represents, and each 11appointed member shall reside both within the district that 12the member represents and outside of the subdistrict within 13which the elected member of the district resides.14    Beginning January 15, 2027, each subdistrict shall be 15represented by one member who is elected at the 2026 general 16election. If a member is elected at the 2026 general election 17to fill the expired term of an appointed member, then the 18elected member shall serve a 2-year term that begins January 1915, 2027. If a member is elected at the 2026 general election 20to fill the expired term of an elected member, then the member 21shall serve a 4-year term that begins January 15, 2027.22    If a member is elected at the 2026 general election to 23serve a 2-year term, then the member elected at the 2028 24general election shall serve a 4-year term that begins January 2515, 2029. If a member is elected at the 2026 general election 26to serve a 4-year term, then the member elected in that   HB1713- 5 -LRB104 08168 LNS 18216 b1subdistrict at the 2030 general election shall serve a 2-year 2term that begins January 15, 2031. 3    Beginning with the members elected at the 2032 general 4election, the members of each subdistrict shall serve two 54-year terms and one 2-year term for each 10-year period 6thereafter. As determined by lot, the terms of the members 7representing the subdistricts shall be the following: 8        (1) the members representing 7 subdistricts shall be 9    elected for one 2-year term, followed by two 4-year terms;10        (2) the members representing 7 subdistricts shall be 11    elected for one 4-year term, followed by one 2-year term, 12    and then one 4-year term; and13        (3) the members representing 6 subdistricts shall be 14    elected for two 4-year terms, followed by one 2-year term. 15    Each elected member shall reside within the subdistrict 16that the member represents. 17    (b-20) All elected and appointed members shall serve until 18a successor is appointed or elected and qualified.19    Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of an appointed 20member of the Board, the Mayor shall appoint, with the advice 21and consent of the City Council, a successor who has the same 22qualifications as the member's predecessor to fill the vacancy 23for the remainder of the unexpired term. 24    Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of an elected 25member of the Board, the President of the Board shall notify 26the Mayor of the vacancy within 7 days after its occurrence and   HB1713- 6 -LRB104 08168 LNS 18216 b1shall, within 30 days, fill the vacancy for the remainder of 2the unexpired term by majority vote of the remaining members 3of the Board. The successor to the elected member shall have 4the same qualifications as the member's predecessor. 5    (b-30) The provisions of Section 10-9 of this Code apply 6to members of the Chicago Board of Education when the Board is 7considering any contract, work, or business of the district, 8and the provisions of the Public Officer Prohibited Activities 9Act that apply to persons holding elected or appointed public 10office also apply to members of the Board, notwithstanding any 11other provision of this Code or any law to the contrary.12    (c) The Board may appoint a student to the board to serve 13in an advisory capacity. The student member shall serve for a 14term as determined by the Board. The Board may not grant the 15student member any voting privileges, but shall consider the 16student member as an advisor. The student member may not 17participate in or attend any executive session of the Board. 18(Source: P.A. 102-177, eff. 6-1-22; 102-691, eff. 12-17-21; 19103-584, eff. 3-18-24.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.